Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1187
Disposition of state government recyclable material.

The Department of Administrative Services shall obtain pricing information and shall contract to sell state government recyclable material for the best terms available in the marketplace. If the department is unable to locate a purchaser for such recyclable material or such sale would not be in the best economic interests of the state and the department is unable to locate a nonpaying contractee to recycle such recyclable material, the department shall make such other disposition of such recyclable material as is most practical and in the best interests of the state.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.04;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1646;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 98;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 40.